New Jersey, session 222, S4369.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.     For the purposes of this section: Farming means the production of agricultural or horticultural products, consistent with applicable law. b.    Notwithstanding any law, ordinance, rule, or regulation to the contrary, farming on a parcel or parcels of land, whether contiguous or noncontiguous, shall be a permitted use in all municipal zoning districts and shall be considered an inherently beneficial use. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.